Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 8. Rights and Limitations of Creditors

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-801.
Creditor claim against founder.

The property of a statutory foundation contributed by a founder or a contributor, and all income, appreciation and proceeds thereof, shall not be subject to the claims of a founder’s or a contributor’s creditor, including any claims for forced heirship or legitime right.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

added "or a contributor" following "founder" and "or a contributor's" following "founder's."

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.